Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.220

Professional gambling in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of professional gambling in the first degree if he or she engages in, or knowingly causes, aids, abets, or conspires with another to engage in professional gambling as defined in this chapter, and:

(a) Acts in concert with or conspires with five or more people;

(b) Personally accepts wagers exceeding five thousand dollars during any thirty-day period on future contingent events;

(c) The operation for whom the person works, or with which the person is involved, accepts wagers exceeding five thousand dollars during any thirty-day period on future contingent events;

(d) Operates, manages, or profits from the operation of a premises or location where persons are charged a fee to participate in card games, lotteries, or other gambling activities that are not authorized by this chapter or licensed by the commission; or

(e) Engages in bookmaking as defined in RCW 9.46.0213.

(2) However, this section shall not apply to those activities enumerated in RCW 9.46.0305 through 9.46.0361 or to any act or acts in furtherance of such activities when conducted in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and in accordance with the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Professional gambling in the first degree is a class B felony subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2020 c 127 s 8; 1997 c 78 s 2; 1994 c 218 s 11; 1991 c 261 s 10; 1987 c 4 s 42; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 22.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2020 c 127: See notes following RCW 9.46.0364.

Effective date—1994 c 218: See note following RCW 9.46.010.